Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-207.01
School of barbering; application to open; fee.

Application for authority to open a new barber school shall be made to the Board of Barber Examiners, on forms to be prescribed by the board, and shall be accompanied by the fee prescribed in section 71-219.

Laws 1963, c. 409, § 8, p. 1318.